Utah statutes.
75-7-404.   Trust purposes.

A trust may be created only to the extent its purposes are lawful, not contrary to public policy, and possible to achieve.  A trust and its terms must be for the benefit of its beneficiaries.



Repealed and Re-enacted by Chapter 89, 2004 General Session

